Utah statutes.
23-25-10.   Amendments to the compact.
(1)  This compact may be amended from time to time. Amendments shall be
presented in resolution form to the chairman of the Board of Compact
Administrators and shall be initiated by one or more participating states.
(2)  Adoption of an amendment shall require endorsement by all participating
states and shall become effective 30 days after the date of the last
endorsement.
(3)  Failure of a participating state to respond to the compact chairman
within 120 days after receipt of a proposed amendment shall constitute
endorsement thereof.
